Missouri, session 2026, HB2109.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 575.270, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 455.400 and 575.270, to read as follows:
455.400. 1. As used in this section, "family justice center" means a multiagency,
multidisciplinary center in which governmental and nongovernmental organizations
provide co-located on-site and off-site services to persons seeking assistance as a result
of victimization related to domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking as defined in
section 455.010, child abuse or neglect, abuse of an eligible adult as defined in section
192.2400, and victims of trafficking as defined in 566.200.
2. A family justice center shall:
(1) Require persons employed by or volunteering directly for the family justice
center to maintain confidentiality of any information that would identify individuals
served by the center and any information or records that are related to the services
provided to such individuals;
(2) Prior to providing any services, inform any person served by the family
justice center of the nature and scope of the confidentiality requirements of subdivision
(1) of this subsection; and
(3) Not require persons served by the family justice center to participate in the
criminal justice system or cooperate with law enforcement in order to receive advocacy,
counseling, medical care, or other services provided at a family justice center.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2109 2
3. A family justice center may include, but is not limited to, personnel and
volunteers from the following governmental and nongovernmental organizations or
providers:
(1) Law enforcement personnel;
(2) Medical personnel;
(3) Prosecuting and circuit attorneys;
(4) Victim-witness program personnel;
(5) Domestic violence shelter service staff;
(6) Rape crisis centers;
(7) Human trafficking advocates;
(8) The department of social services, including the children's division;
(9) County health department staff;
(10) Welfare and public assistance workers;
(11) Counseling professionals;
(12) Civil legal service providers; and
(13) Other professionals providing services.
4. Any person employed by or serving as a volunteer of a family justice center
shall be incompetent to testify concerning any confidential information in subsection 2
of this section unless the confidentiality requirements are waived in writing by the
person served by the family justice center.
5. Any person providing services to another person at a family justice center
under the provisions of this section shall not be liable for civil damages while acting in
the official scope of his or her duties if the person, in good faith, makes a
recommendation, gives an opinion, or releases or uses information for the purposes of
protecting or providing services to the other person. Such limitation of civil liability
does not apply if the person providing services acted with gross negligence or in bad
faith.
6. A city, county, or nonprofit agency may individually or collectively establish a
family justice center.
575.270. 1. A person commits the offense of tampering with a witness or victim if:
(1) With the purpose to induce a witness or a prospective witness to disobey a
subpoena or other legal process, absent himself or herself, avoid subpoena or other legal
process, withhold evidence, information, or documents, or testify falsely, he or she:
(a) Threatens or causes harm to any person or property; or
(b) Uses force, threats or deception; or
(c) Offers, confers or agrees to confer any benefit, direct or indirect, upon such
witness; or

HB 2109 3
(d) Conveys any of the foregoing to another in furtherance of a conspiracy; or
(2) He or she purposely prevents or dissuades or attempts to prevent or dissuade any
person who has been a victim of any crime or a person who is acting on behalf of any such
victim from:
(a) Making any report of such victimization to any peace officer, state, local or federal
law enforcement officer, prosecuting agency, or judge;
(b) Causing a complaint, indictment or information to be sought and prosecuted or
assisting in the prosecution thereof;
(c) Arresting or causing or seeking the arrest of any person in connection with such
victimization.
2. The offense of tampering with a witness or victim is a class A misdemeanor, unless
the original charge is a felony, in which case tampering with a witness or victim is a class D
felony. Persons convicted under this section shall not be eligible for probation, parole,
conditional release, or suspended imposition or execution of sentence.
3. It is the intent of the legislature to reject and abrogate earlier case law
interpretations of subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section including, but not be
limited to, State v. Owens, 270 S.W.3d 533 (Mo. App. W.D. 2008), that requires the state
to prove the underlying criminal offense to prove an offense under this section.
4. As used in this section, a "victim of any crime" shall be interpreted broadly to
include any person who:
(1) Attempted to report such a victimization;
(2) Reported such a victimization;
(3) Caused a complaint, indictment, or information to be sought; or
(4) Is alleged as the victim in a felony complaint, indictment, misdemeanor
information, or felony information.
✔